Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7612
Coverage notification.

(1) A multiple employer welfare arrangement shall notify in writing each participating employer and each employee applying for coverage by the multiple employer welfare arrangement that a health benefit plan provided by the multiple employer welfare arrangement is not:

(a) Insurance;

(b) Subject to state laws and requirements that apply to health insurance offered by a licensed insurer; and

(c) Covered by the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association.

(2) The notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall, in ten-point or greater type, disclose that the multiple employer welfare arrangement is authorized under state law to assess participating employers for claims under the health benefit plan in addition to other remedies the multiple employer welfare arrangement may take if the multiple employer welfare arrangement is unable to pay claims.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 12.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association, see section 44-2705.